Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Licensing.
Sec. 08.64.336.
Duty of physicians and hospitals to report.

A physician who professionally treats a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy in this state for alcoholism or drug addiction, or for mental, emotional, or personality disorders, shall report it to the board if there is probable cause that the person may constitute a danger to the health and welfare of that person’s patients or the public if that person continues in practice. The report must state the name and address of the person and the condition found.

A hospital that revokes, suspends, conditions, restricts, or refuses to grant hospital privileges to, or imposes a consultation requirement on, a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy in the state shall report to the board the name and address of the person and the reasons for the action within seven working days after the action is taken. A hospital shall also report to the board the name and address of a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy in the state if the person resigns hospital staff privileges while under investigation by the hospital or a committee of the hospital and the investigation could result in the revocation, suspension, conditioning, or restricting of, or the refusal to grant, hospital privileges, or in the imposition of a consultation requirement. A report is required under this subsection regardless of whether the person voluntarily agrees to the action taken by the hospital. A report is not required if the sole reason for the action is the person’s failure to complete hospital records in a timely manner or to attend staff or committee meetings. In this subsection “consultation requirement” means a restriction placed on a person’s existing hospital privileges requiring consultation with a designated physician or group of physicians in order to continue to exercise the hospital privileges.

Upon receipt of a report under (a) or (b) of this section, the board shall investigate the matter and, upon a finding that there is reasonable cause to believe that the person who is the subject of the report is a danger to the health or welfare of the public or to the person’s patients, the board may appoint a committee of three qualified physicians to examine the person and report its findings to the board. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, the board may summarily suspend a license under AS

08.64.331(c)

before appointing an examining committee or before the committee makes or reports its findings.

If the board finds that a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy is unable to continue in practice with reasonable safety to the person’s patients or to the public, the board shall initiate action to suspend, revoke, limit, or condition the person’s license to the extent necessary for the protection of the person’s patients and the public.

A physician, hospital, hospital committee, or private professional organization contracted with under AS

08.64.101(a)(5)

to identify, confront, evaluate, and treat individuals licensed under this chapter who abuse addictive substances that in good faith submits a report under this section or participates in an investigation or judicial proceeding related to a report submitted under this section is immune from civil liability for the submission or participation.

A physician or hospital may not refuse to submit a report under this section or withhold from the board or its investigators evidence related to an investigation under this section on the grounds that the report or evidence

concerns a matter that was disclosed in the course of a confidential physician-patient or psychotherapist-patient relationship or during a meeting of a hospital medical staff, governing body, or committee that was exempt from the public meeting requirements of AS

44.62.310

; or

is required to be kept confidential under AS

18.23.030

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 101 SLA 1974; am § 16 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 16 ch 87 SLA 1987; am § 24 ch 126 SLA 1990)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1998 and 2018, a reference to AS

08.64.101

in this section was corrected to reflect renumbering and relettering in that section.

Sec. 08.64.338.
Medical and psychiatric exams.

For the purposes of an investigation under this chapter, the board may order a person to whom it has issued a license or permit to submit to a medical or psychiatric examination by a physician or other practitioner of the healing arts appointed by the board. An examination shall be at the board’s expense. An examination may include the required submission of biological specimens requested by the examining physician or practitioner.

History.

(§ 17 ch 87 SLA 1987)

Sec. 08.64.340.
Statement of grounds of refusal or revocation of license.

If the board refuses to issue a license or revokes a license, it shall file a brief and concise statement of the grounds and reasons for the action in the office of the secretary of the board and in the department.
The statement, together with the written decision of the board, shall remain of record in the department.

History.

(§ 35-3-89 ACLA 1949; am § 23 ch 77 SLA 1969)

Sec. 08.64.345.
Reports relating to malpractice actions and claims.

A person licensed under this chapter shall report in writing to the board concerning the outcome of each medical malpractice claim or civil action in which damages have been or are to be paid by or on behalf of the licensee to the claimant or plaintiff, whether by judgment or under a settlement. This report shall be made within 30 days after resolution of the claim or termination of the civil action.

History.

(§ 25 ch 126 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For malpractice actions, see AS

09.55.530

—

09.55.560

.

Sec. 08.64.350.
Certification of revocation. [Repealed, § 10 ch 37 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 08.64.360.
Penalty for practicing without a license or in violation of law.

Except for a physician assistant or a person licensed or authorized under another law of the state who engages in practices for which that person is licensed or authorized under that law, a person practicing medicine or osteopathy in the state without a valid license or permit is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. Each day of illegal practice is a separate offense.

History.

(§ 35-3-93 ACLA 1949; am § 25 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 2 ch 5 SLA 1972; am § 11 ch 101 SLA 1974; am § 17 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 5 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, deleted “, a mobile intensive care paramedic,” following “Except for a physician assistant”, substituted “law of the state” for “chapter of this title” following “authorized under another” and “law” for “chapter” following “authorized under that”.

Collateral references. —

Hypnotism as illegal practice of medicine, 85 ALR2d 1128.

Single or isolated transactions as falling within provisions of commercial or occupational licensing requirements, 93 ALR2d 90.

Practicing medicine, surgery, dentistry, optometry, podiatry, or other healing arts without license as a separate or continuing offense, 99 ALR2d 654.

Acupuncture as illegal practice of medicine, 72 ALR3d 1257.

Sec. 08.64.362.
Limitation of liability.

An action may not be brought against a person for damages resulting from a report made in good faith to a public agency by the person or participation by the person in an investigation by a public agency or an administrative or judicial proceeding relating to the report if the report relates to a person licensed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 91 SLA 1992)

Sec. 08.64.363.
Maximum dosage for opioid prescriptions.

A licensee may not issue

an initial prescription for an opioid that exceeds a seven-day supply to an adult patient for outpatient use;

a prescription for an opioid that exceeds a seven-day supply to a minor; at the time a licensee writes a prescription for an opioid for a minor, the licensee shall discuss with the parent or guardian of the minor why the prescription is necessary and the risks associated with opioid use.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a licensee may issue a prescription for an opioid that exceeds a seven-day supply to an adult or minor patient if, in the professional medical judgment of the licensee, more than a seven-day supply of an opioid is necessary for

the patient’s acute medical condition, chronic pain management, pain associated with cancer, or pain experienced while the patient is in palliative care; the licensee may write a prescription for an opioid for the quantity needed to treat the patient’s medical condition, chronic pain, pain associated with cancer, or pain experienced while the patient is in palliative care; the licensee shall document in the patient’s medical record the condition triggering the prescription of an opioid in a quantity that exceeds a seven-day supply and indicate that a nonopioid alternative was not appropriate to address the medical condition;

a patient who is unable to access a practitioner within the time necessary for a refill of the seven-day supply because of a logistical or travel barrier; the licensee may write a prescription for an opioid for the quantity needed to treat the patient for the time that the patient is unable to access a practitioner; the licensee shall document in the patient’s medical record the reason for the prescription of an opioid in a quantity that exceeds a seven-day supply and indicate that a nonopioid alternative was not appropriate to address the medical condition; in this paragraph, “practitioner” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

; or

the treatment of a patient’s substance abuse or opioid dependence; the licensee may write a prescription for an opioid approved for the treatment of substance abuse or opioid dependence for the quantity needed to treat the patient’s substance abuse or opioid dependence; the licensee shall document in the patient’s medical record the reason for the prescription of an opioid approved for the treatment of substance abuse or opioid dependence in a quantity that exceeds a seven-day supply and indicate that a nonopioid alternative was not appropriate for the treatment of substance abuse or opioid dependence.

In this section,

“adult” means

an individual who has reached 18 years of age; or

an emancipated minor;

“emancipated minor” means a minor whose disabilities have been removed for general purposes under AS

09.55.590

;

“minor” means an individual under 18 years of age who is not an emancipated minor.

History.

(§ 16 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent regarding this section, see sec. 1, ch. 2, SSSLA 2017 in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective Dates. —

Section 60, ch. 2, SSSLA 2017 makes this section effective July 26, 2017.